src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY aãioŏōôõeznrwcysptkmdłuljgbhśćżfńźvqxAÃIOŎŌÔÕEZNRWCYSPTKMDŁULJGBHŚĆŻFŃŹVQX
KEY qaw|aws|esd|rfd|tgf|ytg|uyh|uji|iko|olp|azs|sxd|dcf|fvg|gbh|hnj|jmk|kl
MAP 9
MAP aã
MAP ey
MAP cć
MAP uō
MAP lł
MAP nń
MAP oōôõŏ
MAP sś
MAP zżź
REP 97
REP mj mi
REP bj bi
REP fj fi
REP dj di
REP gj gi
REP hj hi
REP kj ki
REP lj li
REP pj pi
REP tj ti
REP rj ri
REP wj wi
REP ź zi
REP ć ci
REP ń ni
REP ńi ni
REP ńy nie
REP ś si
REP dź dzi
REP iy i
REP u ł
REP ch h
REP h ch
REP ŏ oł
REP ŏ ōł
REP ŏł oł
REP ů ō
REP u ō
REP ō u
REP ŏ ō
REP ō ŏ
REP ŏ o
REP o ŏ
REP o õ
REP õ o
REP a ŏ
REP ą ōm
REP ą ōn
REP om ōm
REP on ōn
REP uů ô
REP uo ô
REP ło ô
REP o ô
REP oł ŏ
REP ou ŏ
REP em ym
REP en yn
REP e y
REP e ã
REP ę ym
REP ę yn
REP ę yń
REP ż rz
REP rz ż
REP rz sz
REP sz ż
REP sz rz
REP z rz
REP osc ość
REP ise sie
REP zl zł
REP ja yjŏ
REP ia ijŏ
REP ia yjŏ
REP łos ôz
REP łŏs ôz
REP uos ôz
REP uŏs ôz
REP ć dż
REP ć dź
REP ć dz
REP c dz
REP ci ć
REP dź ć
REP dż ć
REP dz ć
REP dzi dź
REP ł eu
REP eu ł
REP śi ś
REP ni ń
REP ś si
REP si ś
REP sić ść
REP zal rzał
REP ůw y
REP ůń ōń
REP ōw y
REP lo dlŏ
REP przez bez
REP niy nie
REP ciy cie
REP i yj
REP i ij
REP em ech
REP am ach
FLAG num
LANG szl
SFX 1 N 1
SFX 1 0 ach .
SFX 2 N 1
SFX 2 0 ami .
SFX 3 N 1
SFX 3 0 a .
SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 ie .
SFX 5 N 1
SFX 5 0 owi .
SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 ōm .
SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 ōw .
SFX 8 N 1
SFX 8 0 ym .
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 0 y .
SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 u .
SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 ze .
SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 ć libymy .
SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 ć libyście .
SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 ć liby .
SFX 15 N 1
SFX 15 ć lichmy .
SFX 16 N 1
SFX 16 ć limy .
SFX 17 N 1
SFX 17 ć liście .
SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 ć li .
SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 ć łabych .
SFX 20 N 1
SFX 20 ć łabyś .
SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 ć łaby .
SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 ć łach .
SFX 23 N 1
SFX 23 ć łaś .
SFX 24 N 1
SFX 24 ć ła .
SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 ć łoby .
SFX 26 N 1
SFX 26 ć ło .
SFX 27 N 1
SFX 27 ć łybymy .
SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 ć łybyście .
SFX 29 N 1
SFX 29 ć łyby .
SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 ć łychmy .
SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 ć łymy .
SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 ć łyście .
SFX 33 N 1
SFX 33 ć ły .
SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 ć nego .
SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 ć ne .
SFX 36 N 1
SFX 36 ć niach .
SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 ć niami .
SFX 38 N 1
SFX 38 ć nia .
SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 ć nie .
SFX 40 N 1
SFX 40 ć nio .
SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 ć niōm .
SFX 42 N 1
SFX 42 ć niu .
SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 ć ni .
SFX 44 N 1
SFX 44 ć niym .
SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 ć no .
SFX 46 N 1
SFX 46 ć nōm .
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 ć nych .
SFX 48 N 1
SFX 48 ć nyj .
SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 ć nymi .
SFX 50 N 1
SFX 50 ć nymu .
SFX 51 N 1
SFX 51 ć nym .
SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 ć ny .
SFX 53 N 1
SFX 53 ć ń .
SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 ać ołbych .
SFX 55 N 1
SFX 55 ać ołbyś .
SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 ać ołby .
SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 ać ołch .
SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 ać ołech .
SFX 59 N 1
SFX 59 ać ołś .
SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 ać oł .
SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 ować uja .
SFX 62 N 1
SFX 62 ować ujcie .
SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 ować ujecie .
SFX 64 N 1
SFX 64 ować ujesz .
SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 ować uje .
SFX 66 N 1
SFX 66 ować ujmy .
SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 ować ujōm .
SFX 68 N 1
SFX 68 ować ujōncego .
SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 ować ujōnce .
SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 ować ujōnco .
SFX 71 N 1
SFX 71 ować ujōncōm .
SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 ować ujōnc .
SFX 73 N 1
SFX 73 ować ujōncych .
SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 ować ujōncyj .
SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 ować ujōncymi .
SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 ować ujōncymu .
SFX 77 N 1
SFX 77 ować ujōncym .
SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 ować ujōncy .
SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 ować uj .
SFX 80 N 1
SFX 80 ować ujymy .
SFX 81 N 1
SFX 81 ki cy .
SFX 82 N 1
SFX 82 i e .
SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 ch .
SFX 84 N 1
SFX 84 0 go .
SFX 85 N 1
SFX 85 0 j .
SFX 86 N 1
SFX 86 0 mi .
SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 mu .
SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 0 m .
SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 i o .
SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 i ōm .
SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 i u .
SFX 92 N 1
SFX 92 o ach .
SFX 93 N 1
SFX 93 o ami .
SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 o e .
SFX 95 N 1
SFX 95 o i .
SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 o ōm .
SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 ło eł .
SFX 98 N 1
SFX 98 ło le .
SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 o a .
SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 o u .
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 o ym .
SFX 102 N 1
SFX 102 ło oł .
SFX 103 N 1
SFX 103 a o .
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 a ōm .
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 a 0 .
SFX 106 N 1
SFX 106 a y .
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 a zie .
SFX 108 N 1
SFX 108 0 e .
SFX 109 N 1
SFX 109 ła le .
SFX 110 N 1
SFX 110 a ōw .
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 ć ciach .
SFX 112 N 1
SFX 112 ć ciami .
SFX 113 N 1
SFX 113 ć ciōm .
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 ć ci .
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 y ego .
SFX 116 N 1
SFX 116 y e .
SFX 117 N 1
SFX 117 y i .
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 y o .
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 y ōm .
SFX 120 N 1
SFX 120 a ze .
SFX 121 N 1
SFX 121 ga dze .
SFX 122 N 1
SFX 122 a i .
SFX 123 N 1
SFX 123 zm źmie .
SFX 124 N 1
SFX 124 t cie .
SFX 125 N 1
SFX 125 t cio .
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 ta cie .
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 a ie .
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 e j .
SFX 129 Y 1
SFX 129 e j .
PFX 129 Y 1
PFX 129 0 noj .
SFX 130 N 1
SFX 130 0 zie .
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 i .
SFX 132 N 1
SFX 132 a e .
SFX 133 N 1
SFX 133 ka ce .
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 ka ek .
SFX 135 N 1
SFX 135 0 chmy .
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 ście .
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 ś .
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 st ście .
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 ōr orach .
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 ōr orami .
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 ōr ora .
SFX 142 N 1
SFX 142 ōr orowi .
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 ōr orōm .
SFX 144 N 1
SFX 144 ōr orōw .
SFX 145 N 1
SFX 145 ōr or .
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 ōr orym .
SFX 147 N 1
SFX 147 ōr ory .
SFX 148 N 1
SFX 148 ōr orze .
SFX 149 N 1
SFX 149 ł le .
SFX 150 N 1
SFX 150 0 -a .
SFX 151 N 1
SFX 151 0 -owi .
SFX 152 N 1
SFX 152 0 -u .
SFX 153 N 1
SFX 153 0 -ym .
SFX 154 N 1
SFX 154 nōńć libymy .
SFX 155 N 1
SFX 155 nōńć libyście .
SFX 156 N 1
SFX 156 nōńć liby .
SFX 157 N 1
SFX 157 nōńć lichmy .
SFX 158 N 1
SFX 158 nōńć limy .
SFX 159 N 1
SFX 159 nōńć liście .
SFX 160 N 1
SFX 160 nōńć li .
SFX 161 N 1
SFX 161 nōńć łabych .
SFX 162 N 1
SFX 162 nōńć łabyś .
SFX 163 N 1
SFX 163 nōńć łaby .
SFX 164 N 1
SFX 164 nōńć łach .
SFX 165 N 1
SFX 165 nōńć łaś .
SFX 166 N 1
SFX 166 nōńć ła .
SFX 167 N 1
SFX 167 nōńć łoby .
SFX 168 N 1
SFX 168 nōńć ło .
SFX 169 N 1
SFX 169 nōńć łybymy .
SFX 170 N 1
SFX 170 nōńć łybyście .
SFX 171 N 1
SFX 171 nōńć łyby .
SFX 172 N 1
SFX 172 nōńć łychmy .
SFX 173 N 1
SFX 173 nōńć łymy .
SFX 174 N 1
SFX 174 nōńć łyście .
SFX 175 N 1
SFX 175 nōńć ły .
SFX 176 N 1
SFX 176 ōńć a .
SFX 177 N 1
SFX 177 ōńć iecie .
SFX 178 N 1
SFX 178 ōńć iesz .
SFX 179 N 1
SFX 179 ōńć ie .
SFX 180 N 1
SFX 180 ōńć ijcie .
SFX 181 N 1
SFX 181 ōńć ijmy .
SFX 182 N 1
SFX 182 ōńć ij .
SFX 183 N 1
SFX 183 ōńć iynci .
SFX 184 N 1
SFX 184 ōńć iyntego .
SFX 185 N 1
SFX 185 ōńć iynte .
SFX 186 N 1
SFX 186 ōńć iynto .
SFX 187 N 1
SFX 187 ōńć iyntōm .
SFX 188 N 1
SFX 188 ōńć iyntych .
SFX 189 N 1
SFX 189 ōńć iyntyj .
SFX 190 N 1
SFX 190 ōńć iyntymi .
SFX 191 N 1
SFX 191 ōńć iyntymu .
SFX 192 N 1
SFX 192 ōńć iyntym .
SFX 193 N 1
SFX 193 ōńć iynty .
SFX 194 N 1
SFX 194 ōńć iyńciach .
SFX 195 N 1
SFX 195 ōńć iyńciami .
SFX 196 N 1
SFX 196 ōńć iyńcia .
SFX 197 N 1
SFX 197 ōńć iyńcie .
SFX 198 N 1
SFX 198 ōńć iyńcio .
SFX 199 N 1
SFX 199 ōńć iyńciōm .
SFX 200 N 1
SFX 200 ōńć iyńciu .
SFX 201 N 1
SFX 201 ōńć iyńciym .
SFX 202 N 1
SFX 202 ōńć iyńć .
SFX 203 N 1
SFX 203 ńć łbych .
SFX 204 N 1
SFX 204 ńć łbyś .
SFX 205 N 1
SFX 205 ńć łby .
SFX 206 N 1
SFX 206 ńć łch .
SFX 207 N 1
SFX 207 ńć łech .
SFX 208 N 1
SFX 208 ńć łś .
SFX 209 N 1
SFX 209 ńć ł .
SFX 210 N 1
SFX 210 ńć m .
SFX 211 N 1
SFX 211 ōńć ymy .
SFX 212 N 1
SFX 212 er rach .
SFX 213 N 1
SFX 213 er rami .
SFX 214 N 1
SFX 214 er ra .
SFX 215 N 1
SFX 215 er rowi .
SFX 216 N 1
SFX 216 er rōm .
SFX 217 N 1
SFX 217 er rōw .
SFX 218 N 1
SFX 218 er rym .
SFX 219 N 1
SFX 219 er ry .
SFX 220 N 1
SFX 220 er rze .
SFX 221 N 1
SFX 221 sta ście .
SFX 222 N 1
SFX 222 y iyjsi .
SFX 223 N 1
SFX 223 y iyjszego .
SFX 224 N 1
SFX 224 y iyjsze .
SFX 225 N 1
SFX 225 y iyjszo .
SFX 226 N 1
SFX 226 y iyjszōm .
SFX 227 N 1
SFX 227 y iyjszych .
SFX 228 N 1
SFX 228 y iyjszyj .
SFX 229 N 1
SFX 229 y iyjszymi .
SFX 230 N 1
SFX 230 y iyjszymu .
SFX 231 N 1
SFX 231 y iyjszym .
SFX 232 N 1
SFX 232 y iyjszy .
SFX 233 Y 1
SFX 233 y iyjsi .
PFX 233 Y 1
PFX 233 0 noj .
