src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
kōmpotszisla/83,86,132,122,103,104,110
legislacyjo/92,93,94,95,96
leksykografijo/92,93,94,95,96
lubelski/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91
materializacyjo/92,93,94,95,96
matrykulacyjo/92,93,94,95,96
melanizm/1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9,123
melōn/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9
minus/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9
mizoginizm/1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9,123
motyw/1,2,4,5,6,7,10,8,9
panegiryzm/1,2,5,6,7,10,8,9,123
pasażer/1,2,3,5,6,7,8,9,11
pigwa/83,86,127,103,104,105,106
pochwoła/109,83,86,103,104,110,106
pozaekōnōmiczność/111,112,113,114
pozakryślać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
pozapewniać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
pozdzielać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
pozgrzipować/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,69,70,71,72,73,74,75,76,77,78,79,80
poôbkupować/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,79,80
poôboczać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
poôbrywać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
poôtwiyrać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
poôwijać/410,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
połowiczność/111,112,113,114
połōmać/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,1077,1078,1079,1080,1081,1082,1094,1095,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,1096
poświadczać/410,411,412,413,414,415,416,417,418,419,420,421,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,422,423,424,425,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,426,427,428,429
przełōm/1,2,4,5,6,7,10,8,9
siodło/98,92,93,99,96,100,101,102
skandynawistyka/133,83,86,122,103,104,105
skazōwka/133,134,83,86,122,103,104
skōrkorz/1,2,3,108,5,6,7,10,8,9
stołowy/115,116,117,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
stroka/133,83,86,122,103,104,105
strzybło/97,98,92,93,99,96,100,101,102
szkłōdliwy/115,116,117,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
szmotlawy/115,116,117,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
sztyryrogaty/553,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
trepkorz/1,2,3,108,5,6,7,10,8,9
trziniecki/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91
trzoda/83,86,103,104,105,106,107
wieprzowina/83,86,127,103,104,105,106
wilamowski/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91
wojocki/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90
wymiōnczko/578,92,93,99,96,100,101
wyrōwnować/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,69,70,71,72,73,74,75,76,77,78,79,80
zambijski/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,91
zbōn/1,2,3,4,5,6,7,8,9
zgniylstwo/92,93,99,440,96,100,361,101
zicherować/12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,20,21,22,23,24,25,26,27,28,29,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,45,46,47,48,49,50,51,52,53,54,55,56,57,58,59,60,61,62,63,64,65,66,67,68,69,70,71,72,73,74,75,76,77,78,79,80
ziebro/573,92,93,99,96,100,101,574
źrōdło/97,98,92,93,99,96,100,101
